fr: Type de fibre animale discontinue: Alpaga; Angora (lapin); Chameau; Cachemire (chèvre); Lama; Laine mérinos; Mohair (chèvre); Laine de mouton; Yack; Autre
el: Τύπος ζωικής ασυνεχούς ίνας: Αλπακά; Ανγκορά (κουνέλι); Καμήλα; Κασμίρι (κατσίκα); Λάμα; Μαλλί μερινό; Μοχέρ (κατσίκα); Μαλλί προβάτου; Γιάκ; Άλλο
ko: 스테이플 섬유 동물성 섬유 유형: 알파카; 앙고라(토끼); 낙타; 캐시미어(염소); 라마; 메리노 울; 모헤어(염소); 양털; 야크; 기타
vi: Sợi xơ ngắn, loại sợi động vật.: Lạc đà Alpaca; Angora (thỏ); Lạc đà; Cashmere (dê); Llama; Len Merino; Mohair (dê); Len cừu; Bò Yak; Khác
pt-BR: Fibra descontínua tipo de fibra animal: Alpaca; Angorá (coelho); Camelo; Cashmere (cabra); Lhama; Lã de merino; Mohair (cabra); Lã de ovelha; Iaque; Outro
sv: Typ av animalisk stapelfiber: Alpacka; Angora (kanin); Kamel; Kaschmir (get); Lama; Merinoull; Mohair (get); Fårull; Jak; Övrigt
nb: Fibertype for animalsk stapelfiber: Alpakka; Angora (kanin); Kamel; Kasjmir (geit); Lama; Merinoull; Mohair (geit); Saueull; Jak; Annet
cs: Typ střižového zvířecího vlákna: Alpaka; Angora (králík); Velbloudí srst; Kašmír (koza); Lama; Merino vlna; Mohér (koza); Ovčí vlna; Jak; Jiné
lt-LT: Kuokštinio pluošto gyvūninio pluošto tipas: Alpakų; Angoros (triušių); Kupranugarių; Kašmyras (ožkų); Lamų; Merinosų vilna; Mohera (ožkų); Avių vilna; Jakų; Kita
pl: Typ zwierzęcego włókna odcinkowego: Alpaka; Angora (królik); Wielbłąd; Kaszmir (koza); Lama; Wełna merynosowa; Moher (koza); Wełna owcza; Jak; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de fibra animal descontínua: Alpaca; Angorá (coelho); Camelo; Caxemira (cabra); Lama; Lã merino; Mohair (cabra); Lã de ovelha; Iaque; Outro
nl: Stapelvezel dierlijk vezeltype: Alpaca; Angora (konijn); Kameel; Kasjmier (geit); Lama; Merinowol; Mohair (geit); Schapenwol; Yak; Overige
hu: Állati eredetű vágott fonal: Alpaka; Angóra (nyúl); Teve; Kasmír (kecske); Láma; Merinói gyapjú; Moher (kecske); Juhgyapjú; Jak; Egyéb
it: Tipo di fibra animale in fiocco: Alpaca; Angora (coniglio); Cammello; Cashmere (capra); Lama; Lana merino; Mohair (capra); Lana di pecora; Yak; Altro
ru: Тип животного волокна комплексной пряжи: Альпака; Ангора (кролик); Верблюд; Кашемир (коза); Лама; Шерсть мериноса; Мохер (коза); Овечья шерсть; Як; Другое
zh-TW: 短纖維動物纖維類型: 羊駝毛; 安哥拉兔毛; 駱駝毛; 喀什米爾羊毛 (山羊); 駱馬毛; 美麗諾羊毛; 馬海毛 (山羊); 綿羊毛; 犛牛毛; 其他
ja: 短繊維動物繊維タイプ: アルパカ; アンゴラ (ウサギ); キャメル; カシミヤ (ヤギ); リャマ; メリノウール; モヘヤ (ヤギ); 羊毛; ヤク; その他
es: Fibra discontinua tipo fibra animal: Alpaca; Angora (conejo); Camello; Cachemira (cabra); Llama; Lana merino; Mohair (cabra); Lana de oveja; Yak; Otro
th: เส้นใยหลัก เส้นใยจากสัตว์: อัลปาก้า; แองโกร่า (กระต่าย); อูฐ; แคชเมียร์ (แพะ); ลามะ; ขนแกะเมอริโน; โมแฮร์ (แพะ); ขนแกะ; จามรี; อื่นๆ
de: Tierfaserart der Stapelfaser: Alpaka; Angora (Kaninchen); Kamel; Kaschmir (Ziege); Lama; Merinowolle; Mohair (Ziege); Schafwolle; Yak; Sonstige
da: Animalsk fibertype for stapelfiber: Alpaka; Angora (kanin); Kamel; Kashmir (ged); Lama; Merinould; Mohair (ged); Fåreuld; Yak; Andet
fi: Katkokuidun eläinkuidun tyyppi: Alpakka; Angora (kani); Kameli; Kashmir (vuohi); Laama; Merinovilla; Mohair (vuohi); Lampaanvilla; Jakki; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta živalskih vlaken rezanih vlaken: Alpaka; Angora (zajec); Kamela; Kašmir (koza); Lama; Merino volna; Moher (koza); Ovčja volna; Jak; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ živočíšnej strižnej vlákniny: Alpaka; Angora (králik); Ťava; Kašmír (koza); Lama; Merino vlna; Mohér (koza); Ovčia vlna; Jak; Iné
tr: Hayvansal elyaf türü: Alpaka; Angora (tavşan); Deve; Kaşmir (keçi); Lama; Merinos yünü; Tiftik (keçi); Koyun yünü; Yak; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de fibră animală (fibre discontinue): Alpaca; Angora (iepure); Cămilă; Cașmir (capră); Lamă; Lână merino; Mohair (capră); Lână de oaie; Iac; Altele
zh-CN: 短纤维动物纤维类型: 羊驼毛; 安哥拉兔毛; 骆驼毛; 羊绒; 大羊驼毛; 美丽诺羊毛; 马海毛; 绵羊毛; 牦牛绒; 其他
en: Staple fiber animal fiber type: Alpaca; Angora (rabbit); Camel; Cashmere (goat); Llama; Merino wool; Mohair (goat); Sheep wool; Yak; Other
bg-BG: Тип животинско влакно от щапелни влакна: Алпака; Ангора (заек); Камила; Кашмир (коза); Лама; Мериносова вълна; Мохер (коза); Овча вълна; Як; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta životinjskih vlakana od rezanaca: Alpaka; Angora (zec); Deva; Kašmir (koza); Ljama; Merino vuna; Mohair (koza); Ovčja vuna; Jak; Ostalo